Hawaii statutes.
§661-10 Actions by State. Whenever it
is necessary or desirable for the State in order to collect or recover any
money or penalty, or to recover or obtain the possession of any specific
property, real or personal, or to enforce any other right (except in respect to
criminal prosecutions) to institute judicial proceedings, except as otherwise
expressly provided by law, the attorney general may bring and maintain an
action or actions for any such purpose in any appropriate court or courts. All
such actions shall be entitled in the name of the State by the attorney
general, against the party or parties or thing sued, as defendants. [L 1888, c
51, §1; am imp Org Act, §§2, 81, 86; RL 1925, §2678; RL 1935, §4429; RL 1945,
§10484; RL 1955, §245-10; HRS §661-10; am L 1972, c 164, §1(h)]

Case Notes

Where complaints asserted that the attorney general brought
the actions under §480-2(d) and this section, the state procedural devices were
not similar to an action under rule 23 of the federal rules of civil procedure.
761 F.3d 1027 (2014).

Discussed, regarding the attorney general's authority to
bring a non-class action parens patriae suit that sought, among other things,
an order enjoining defendants from engaging in unfair or deceptive acts or
practices and civil penalties. 907 F. Supp. 2d 1188 (2012).

Suit by public official must be in the name of the
government. 7 H. 314.

Suit entitled in name of the Hawaiian government by attorney
general could be brought by attorney general through counsel. 8 H. 16.

Section is irrelevant and attorney general is without
standing as party to rate proceeding before PUC. 54 H. 663, 513 P.2d 1376.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next